Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2108
Registration number.

Within thirty days of receipt of a completed application, the commissioner shall issue to the contractor a registration number. The registration number shall be a five-digit number followed by a two-digit number indicating the year of issuance.

Laws 1994, LB 248, § 8.